Hawaii statutes.
§150A-5.3 Inspection, quarantine, and
eradication service fee and charge. (a) There is imposed
a fee for the inspection, quarantine, and eradication of invasive species
contained in any freight, including marine commercial container shipment, air
freight, or any other means of transporting freight, foreign or domestic, but
not including aggregate bulk freight, cement bulk freight, coal bulk freight,
or liquid bulk freight, that is brought into the State. The transportation
company shall bill the fee to the person responsible for paying the freight
charges to the transportation company within fifteen days of the delivery of
the freight. The fee shall be paid by the person responsible for paying
the freight charges to the transportation company within forty-five days of
receipt of the bill. The transportation company shall collect the fee
from the person responsible and forward the payment to the department at the
port of disembarkation within forty-five days of receipt of the fee; provided
that the transportation company shall not be liable for any fee that is not
paid by the person responsible for paying the freight charges to the
transportation company.

The department shall deposit the fee into the
pest inspection, quarantine, and eradication fund under section 150A-4.5.

(b) The fee shall be assessed and
collected on the net weight of the imported freight computed on the basis of 75
cents for every one thousand pounds of freight, or part thereof, brought into
the State. [L Sp 2007, c 9, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 16, §4; am L Sp 2008, c 3, §3;
am L 2010, c 173, §5; am L 2011, c 36, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next